District of Columbia statutes.
2-1321

Established.

There is hereby established a Commission on Latino Community Development to advise the Mayor, the Director of the Office on Latino Affairs, the Council, and the public concerning the views and needs of the Latino community in the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 401, 23 DCR 2543
Oct. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-42, § 9(c)(2), 28 DCR 3425

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1302.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2321.
1973 Ed., § 6-1921.